Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 19. Subversive Groups and Subversive Activities

§§ 45-19-51 through 45-19-65.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 16, effective July 1, 2017.

§§45-19-51 through45-19-65. [Codes, 1942, §§ 4194-01 to 4194-08; Laws, 1958, ch. 484, § 1 through 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1958).]